Vermont, session 2025-2026, H561.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 248c is amended to read:
§ 248c. FEES; DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE AND PUBLIC
UTILITY COMMISSION; PARTICIPATION IN CERTIFICATION
AND SITING PROCEEDINGS
* * *
(d) Electric and natural gas facilities. This subsection sets fees for
registrations and applications under section 248 of this title.
(1) There shall be a fee of $100.00 $200.00 for each electric generation
facility less than or equal to 50 kW in plant capacity, or for a rooftop project,
or for a hydroelectric project filing a net metering registration, or for an
application filed under subsection 248(n) of this title, or for an energy storage
VT LEG #386173 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.561
2026 Page 2 of 3
facility less than or equal to 1 MW in nameplate capacity that is required to
obtain a certificate of public good under section 248 of this title and is
proposed to be located inside an existing building and that would not require
any ground disturbance work or upgrades to the distribution system.
(2) There shall be a fee of $25.00 $200.00 for modifications for each
electric generation facility less than or equal to 50 kW in plant capacity, or for
a rooftop project, or for a hydroelectric project filing a net metering
registration, or for an application filed under subsection 248(n) of this title, or
for an energy storage facility less than or equal to 1 MW in nameplate capacity
that is required to obtain a certificate of public good under section 248 of this
title and is proposed to be located inside an existing building and that would
not require any ground disturbance work or upgrades to the distribution
system.
(3) There shall be a fee for electric generation facilities and energy
storage facilities that are required to obtain a certificate of public good under
section 248 of this title and that do not qualify for the lower fees in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, calculated as follows:
(A) $5.00 $8.00 per kW; and
(B) $100.00 $400.00 for modifications.
* * *
VT LEG #386173 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.561
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386173 v.2